Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.140

Metropolitan council—Terms.

Each member of a metropolitan council except those selected under the provisions of RCW 35.58.120, shall hold office at the pleasure of the body which selected him or her. Each member, who shall hold office ex officio, may not hold office after he or she ceases to hold the position of elected county executive, mayor, commissioner, or councilmember. The chair shall hold office until the second Tuesday in July of each even-numbered year and may, if reelected, serve more than one term. Each member shall hold office until his or her successor has been selected as provided in this chapter.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2100; 1971 ex.s. c 303 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 135 s 2; 1967 c 105 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.140. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 14.]